Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 11. Miscellaneous Provisions

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-29-1101.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-1102.
Secretary of state powers.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him by this chapter. The secretary of state shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-1103.
Application to existing domestic limited liability companies.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this chapter applies to domestic limited liability companies in existence on July 1, 2010 that were organized under any general statute of this state providing for organization of limited liability companies.

For limited liability companies organized in Wyoming prior to the effective date of this chapter, the management provisions contained in former W.S.

17-15-116

, the division of profits provisions contained in former W.S.

17-15-119

, the distribution of assets upon dissolution provisions contained in former W.S.

17-15-126

and the stated term provisions contained in former W.S. 17-15-107(a)(ii) are continued for a period of four (4) years from the effective date of this chapter unless the limited liability company amends its articles of organization to provide otherwise.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1; 2012, ch. 78, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

in (a), substituted “July 1, 2010” for “its effective date” and deleted “if power to amend or repeal the statute under which the limited liability company was organized was reserved” at the end.

Laws 2012, ch. 78 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

§ 17-29-1104.
Applications to qualified foreign limited liability companies.

A foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state on the effective date of this chapter is subject to this chapter but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under this chapter.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-1105.
Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the repeal of a statute by this act does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation or liability acquired, accrued or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute, or any penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal; or

Any proceeding or dissolution commenced under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by this act is reduced by this act, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.